Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.183.050

Service information collection—Feedback.

(1) School districts must annually collect the following language access and language access service information for use by the school district:

(a) The language in which each student and student's family prefers to communicate;

(b) Whether a qualified interpreter for the student's family was requested for and provided at meetings reported in the longitudinal student data system established under RCW 28A.300.500; and

(c) Other data on provision of language access services.

(2) School districts must submit the information collected under subsection (1) of this section at the time and in the manner required by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) Beginning in the 2023-24 school year, school districts must provide an opportunity for participants in each interpreted meeting to provide feedback on the effectiveness of the interpretation and the provision of language access services.

[ 2022 c 107 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 107: See note following RCW 28A.183.010.